Hawaii, session 2026, HB2240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $13,045,166 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the senate for the following expenses: (1)  The sum of $11,646,694 for defraying any and all session and nonsession expenses of the senate up to and including June 30, 2027, including the 2026 regular session, thirty-third legislature of the State of Hawaii, and pre-session expenses and the expenses of any committee or committees established during the interim between the 2026 and 2027 regular sessions; (2)  The sum of $1,273,855 for defraying the expenses of the legislative information system for cost items such as hardware, software, consultants, installation, materials, supplies, and other related costs associated with the legislative information system that have been or will be incurred; and (3)  The sum of $124,616 for defraying the cost of the legislative broadcasting program to pay for the production and distribution of broadcasts of legislative proceedings, including but not limited to television broadcast, live streaming, and internet platforms for public access. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the senate. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $17,808,628 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the house of representatives for the following expenses: (1)  The sum of $16,644,520 for defraying any and all session and nonsession expenses of the house of representatives up to and including June 30, 2027, including the 2026 regular session, thirty-third legislature of the State of Hawaii, and pre-session expenses and the expenses of any committee or committees established during the interim between the 2026 and 2027 regular sessions; (2)  The sum of $1,039,492 for defraying the expenses of the legislative information system for cost items such as hardware, software, consultants, installation, materials, supplies, and other related costs associated with the legislative information system that have been or will be incurred; and (3)  The sum of $124,616 for defraying the cost of the legislative broadcasting program to pay for the production and distribution of broadcasts of legislative proceedings, including but not limited to television broadcast, live streaming, and internet platforms for public access. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the house of representatives. SECTION 3.  Payment of expenses of the senate during the interim between the 2026 and 2027 regular sessions shall be made only with the approval of the president of the senate, and payment of expenses of the house of representatives during the interim between the 2026 and 2027 regular sessions shall be made only with the approval of the speaker of the house of representatives. SECTION 4.  Before January 20, 2027, the senate and the house of representatives shall each have their accounts audited, and a full report of the respective audits shall be presented to the senate and house of representatives convening on January 20, 2027. SECTION 5.  Unless otherwise prescribed by law, the expenses of any member of the legislature while traveling abroad on official business of the legislature shall be $145 a day as authorized by the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,923,712 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the office of the auditor for the following expenses: (1)  The sum of $3,773,712 for defraying the expenses of the office of the auditor during fiscal year 2026‑2027; and (2)  The sum of $150,000 during fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (A)  Performing special studies; (B)  Improving capabilities for planning, programming, and budgeting; (C)  Fulfilling other special requests made of the auditor by the legislature or jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; (D)  Legislative studies and contractual services for those studies; and (E)  Such other purposes as may be determined by the joint action of the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the auditor. SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,800,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the office of the auditor during fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the audit revolving fund established pursuant to section 23-3.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 8.  There is appropriated out of the audit revolving fund the sum of $6,800,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the office of the auditor during fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office to conduct or complete its audit functions as provided by law. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the auditor. SECTION 9.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,791,670 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the legislative reference bureau for defraying the expenses of the legislative reference bureau during fiscal year 2026-2027, including equipment relating to computer systems programming and operations. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the legislative reference bureau. SECTION 10.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,744,123 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the office of the ombudsman for defraying the expenses of the office during fiscal year 2026‑2027. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the ombudsman. SECTION 11.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,755,348 or so much thereof as may be necessary to the office of the state ethics commission for defraying the expenses of the office during fiscal year 2026-2027. The sum appropriated in this section shall be expended by the state ethics commission. SECTION 12.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to be expended for the purpose of accrued vacation payments and vacation transfer payments for any employee leaving the employ of the senate, house of representatives, office of the auditor, legislative reference bureau, office of the ombudsman, and state ethics commission: Expending Agency                            Amount Senate                                    $295,000 House of Representatives                   $354,607 Office of the Auditor                       $68,106 Legislative Reference Bureau               $100,780 Office of the Ombudsman                     $84,035 State Ethics Commission                     $16,553 provided that the appropriate expending agency shall first make payments from the vacation payout allocation before expending funds from turnover and vacancy amounts; provided further that any unexpended funds shall lapse to the general fund on June 30, 2027. SECTION 13.  As of the close of business on June 30, 2027, the unexpended or unencumbered balance of any appropriation made by this Act shall lapse into the general fund. SECTION 14.  Each section of this Act is declared to be severable from the remainder of this Act. SECTION 15.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________